Utah statutes.
53A-17a-124.   Quality Teaching Block Grant Program -- State contributions.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall distribute money appropriated for the Quality Teaching Block Grant Program to school districts and charter schools according to a formula adopted by the board, after consultation with school districts and charter schools, that allocates the funding in a fair and equitable manner.

(2) (a)  Schools districts and charter schools shall use Quality Teaching Block Grant money to implement school and school district comprehensive, long-term professional development plans required by Section 53A-3-701.

(b)  In recognition of exceptional quality teaching, Quality Teaching Block Grant money may be used for the award of individual Quality Teaching Bonuses for Exemplary Teachers to recognize and reward excellence in classrooms as determined by school principals in partnership with their school community councils.

(3)  Each local school board shall:

(a)  as provided by Section 53A-3-701, review and either approve or recommend modifications for each school's comprehensive, long-term professional development plan within the district so that each school's plan is compatible with the district's comprehensive, long-term professional development plan; and

(b)  in an open public meeting, approve a plan to spend Quality Teaching Block Grant money to implement the school district's comprehensive, long-term professional development plan.

